Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 5 Trial Courts
16-2-507. Incumbent judges — Cooperation between judges.

All incumbent trial court judges shall hold office in and serve the judicial district of which they have been designated by § 16-2-506.

It is the affirmative duty of every trial court judge to fully cooperate with the presiding judge and the other judges in the district.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of court space by presiding judge, OAG 99-049 (3/2/99).

16-2-508. District attorneys general — Powers and duties — Assistant district attorneys general — Criminal investigators — Other positions.

All incumbent district attorneys general shall hold office in and serve the judicial district to which they are assigned by § 16-2-506. The district attorneys general shall exercise and possess the jurisdiction, powers and duties within the judicial districts created by this part as are conferred by law upon district attorneys general. This part shall not be construed to make any reduction in the staff of any district attorney general, and any legislative act that creates assistant district attorney general, criminal investigator or other positions, or that otherwise affects or involves the office of district attorney general in a particular judicial district or attorney's district as it is presently numbered or identified is made applicable to the judicial district to which the present district attorney general is assigned by this part. Nothing in this part shall be construed as affecting a county's authority to provide staff and other resources to the district attorney general of the district in which the county is located.

Except in the judicial districts comprised of the urban counties of Shelby, Davidson, Knox, Hamilton and Sullivan, the district attorney general of each judicial district shall be entitled to at least one (1) assistant district attorney general position for each trial court judge in the judicial district to which the district attorney general is assigned, as well as either one (1) additional assistant district attorney general position if the judicial district is comprised of four (4) or more counties, or two (2) additional assistant district attorney general positions if the judicial district is comprised of more than six (6) counties. If an additional trial court judge is added to a judicial district, and that district does not already have sufficient assistant district attorney general positions to satisfy the formula set out in this subsection (b), an additional assistant district attorney general position shall be created for that district upon the effective date of the creation of the new judicial position.

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, effective March 20, 2013.]

The district attorney general of any judicial district in which an assistant district attorney general position is created by this part shall appoint a suitable person to serve as assistant district attorney general. The person so appointed shall serve at the pleasure of the district attorney general, and shall perform the duties the district attorney general requires. Each person so appointed shall be compensated as provided for by general law.

Except for the assistant district attorney general position created annually by former subsection (c) and those created when, pursuant to § 16-2-506, an additional trial court judge is elected in 1986, 1988 or 1990, the number of such assistant positions set out in § 16-2-506 shall be the total number of positions to which the corresponding district attorney general is entitled, and nothing in this section shall be construed as creating any assistant positions in excess of such number.

The district attorneys general shall appoint suitable individuals to the position of criminal investigator. The individuals so appointed shall perform such duties as the district attorney general may direct, and shall serve at the pleasure of the district attorney general.

In carrying out the duties of the criminal investigator's office, each of the criminal investigators shall possess the same power and authority as deputies of the county sheriffs or if the judicial district includes a metropolitan form of government then their power and authority shall include all police powers of law enforcement officers in that area metropolitan government. The compensation of such investigators shall be as provided by general law.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 8; 1986, ch. 813, §§ 2, 3; 1989, ch. 144, § 2; 1996, ch. 996, § 2; 2013, ch. 21, § 2; 2013, ch. 68, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 813 created criminal investigator positions in the 1st, 5th, 15th, 17th, 19th, 23rd, 24th, 25th and 26th judicial districts.

Acts 1996, ch. 996, § 2 provided that the name “executive director of the district attorneys general conference” be substituted for “executive secretary to the district attorneys general conference”.

Subsection (e) refers to former subsection (c), which was deleted by Acts 2013, ch. 21, § 2, effective March 20, 2013, and which read: “(c) The district attorneys general of the judicial districts comprising the urban counties of Shelby, Davidson, Knox, Hamilton and Sullivan shall retain their present number of assistant district attorneys general, except that on September 1, 1985, and on each successive September 1 through 1990, one (1) additional assistant district attorney general position shall be created, and assigned to the urban district then having the highest ratio of population to assistant district attorneys general. On August 1, 1985, through August 1, 1990, the office of local government of the office of the comptroller of the treasury shall determine which of the five (5) urban judicial districts listed above has the highest ratio of population to assistant district attorney general positions. The office of local government shall notify the executive director of the district attorneys general conference who shall notify the district attorney general of the district with the highest ratio that effective September 1, of that year the district attorney general is entitled to employ one (1) additional assistant district attorney general.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by ch. 21 deleted (c) which read: “The district attorneys general of the judicial districts comprising the urban counties of Shelby, Davidson, Knox, Hamilton and Sullivan shall retain their present number of assistant district attorneys general, except that on September 1, 1985, and on each successive September 1 through 1990, one (1) additional assistant district attorney general position shall be created, and assigned to the urban district then having the highest ratio of population to assistant district attorneys general. On August 1, 1985, through August 1, 1990, the office of local government of the office of the comptroller of the treasury shall determine which of the five (5) urban judicial districts listed above has the highest ratio of population to assistant district attorney general positions. The office of local government shall notify the executive director of the district attorneys general conference who shall notify the district attorney general of the district with the highest ratio that effective September 1, of that year the district attorney general is entitled to employ one (1) additional assistant district attorney general.”

The 2013 amendment by ch. 68 rewrote (f) which read: “(f)(1) The district attorney general for the first, fifth, fifteenth, seventeenth, nineteenth, twenty-third, twenty-fourth, twenty-fifth and twenty-sixth districts shall appoint a suitable person to the position of criminal investigator. The person so appointed shall perform the duties that the district attorney general directs, and shall serve at the pleasure of the district attorney general.“(2) In carrying out the duties of the criminal investigator's office, each of the criminal investigators created by Acts 1986, ch. 813, shall possess the same power and authority as deputies of the county sheriffs. The compensation of the investigators shall be as provided by general law.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 21, § 4. March 20, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 68, § 4. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Criminal investigators and assistant district attorneys general, compensation, title 8, ch. 7, part 2.

District attorneys general, title 8, ch. 7, part 1.

16-2-509. Presiding judges.

The judges in each judicial district shall assemble for the purpose of selecting a presiding judge of the district. In August of each year, the judges within each district shall assemble at the call of the presiding judge and select a successor to such presiding judge who shall serve until September 1 of the following year. If upon any selection date the judges in any district fail to choose or are unable to agree upon the selection of a presiding judge, the chief justice of the supreme court shall designate one (1) of their number to serve.

It is the duty of the presiding judge to:

Reduce docket delays and hold congestion to a minimum;

Seek and maintain an equitable distribution of the workload and an equal sharing of the bench and chambers time necessary to dispose of the business of the district;

Promote the orderly and efficient administration of justice within the district; and

Take immediate and affirmative action to correct or alleviate any caseload imbalance, or any condition adversely affecting the administration of justice within the district over which the judge presides.

To effectuate the duties enumerated in subsection (b), the presiding judge may assign cases to judges and chancellors within the district over which the judge presides. In assigning cases, the presiding judge shall, whenever possible and not detrimental to the orderly and efficient administration of justice, give due regard to the court upon which the judge or chancellor serves, the judge's or chancellor's particular background, experience and preference and economy of judicial travel time.

If a presiding judge is unable to correct a caseload imbalance or reduce docket delays utilizing the available judges within the district over which the judge presides, it is the affirmative duty of the presiding judge to contact other presiding judges and request assistance or contact the supreme court and request assistance pursuant to § 16-3-502.

This part shall not be construed as altering or modifying any law concerning interchange by agreement.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 9; 2005, ch. 26, § 1.

Cross-References. Interchange of judges, § 17-2-202.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 11, §§ III, VII of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee; and in Rule 2, Davidson County Local Rules of Practice, Courts of Record, Twentieth Judicial District of Tennessee.

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of court space by presiding judge, OAG 99-049 (3/2/99).

Although T.C.A. § 16-2-505(d)(2) does not expressly authorize the court security committee to adopt any measures with regard to courthouse security, it is reasonable to infer that the committee may put into effect security measures affecting the security of space and facilities provided to state trial judges, so long as these measures do not require county expenditures; these measures may affect general sessions courtrooms and personnel, as well as the personnel of other offices located in the courthouse, if the measures are reasonably related to ensuring security of space and facilities provided to state trial judges, OAG 02-052 (4/24/02).

Cited: State Dep't of Children's Servs. v. A.M.H., 198 S.W.3d 757, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 156 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2006).

16-2-510. Holding of court — Terms abolished — Grand juries.

Court shall be held within each judicial district at such times and on such dates as the judges of each judicial district fix by rule. Court shall be held in each county within the district as often as is necessary to dispose of the business of the court. Not less than thirty (30) days prior to the rule taking effect, the rule shall be published and circulated to the practicing bar, and filed with the administrative director of the courts.

Terms of court are abolished and the minutes of all courts shall remain open continuously. Any reference in Tennessee Code Annotated to the beginning of a term of court shall be deemed to be a reference to the appropriate date fixed by rule as provided by this section.

New grand juries shall be impaneled at least twice a year at times selected by the presiding judge of the district. The presiding judge within each district shall be responsible for designating the foreperson and for impaneling, charging and receiving the report of the grand jury, but may designate another judge to perform these responsibilities. In those districts in which there is a criminal court judge or judges, the criminal court judge or judges shall perform the duties pertaining to the grand jury assigned to the presiding judge by this subsection (c).

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 10; 1993, ch. 66, § 16.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 24.10, 24.18, 24.80, 25.14, 25.20, 25.22, 25.54.

Law Reviews.

A Noble Ideal Whose Time Has Come (Penny J. White), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 223 (1989).

Cited: State v. Osborne, 712 S.W.2d 488, 1986 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 2604 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1986).

16-2-511. Uniform rules of practice — Designation of court by certain types of cases.

Uniform rules of practice may be promulgated in each district by the judges of the district. The rules shall be consistent with the statutory law, the rules of the supreme court and the rules of criminal and civil procedure. The judges within a district may, by rule, designate courts or parts of a court that will be primarily responsible for hearing certain types of cases or cases dealing with certain areas of the law. Not less than thirty (30) days prior to the rules taking effect, copies of the rules shall be published and circulated to the practicing bar and filed with the administrative director of the courts.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 11; 1993, ch. 66, § 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.18.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Notice in Tennessee (Robert Banks, Jr. and Elizabeth T. Collins), 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1991).

Cited: Hessmer v. Hessmer, 138 S.W.3d 901, 2003 Tenn. App. LEXIS 346 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2003); Tigg v. Pirelli Tire Corp., 232 S.W.3d 28, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 641 (Tenn. Aug. 16, 2007); Metropolitan Gov't of Nashville v. Cuozzo, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 498 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 25, 2008).

16-2-512. Recommendations classifying elected additional judges.

Where § 16-2-506 requires the election of an additional judge in a judicial district, the presiding judge of the district shall notify the trial court vacancy commission in writing of the judge's recommendation as to whether the additional judge will be a circuit court judge, criminal court judge, or chancellor and of the part of court the judge or chancellor will serve. The recommendation must be made by January 1 of the year in which the additional judge is to be elected and must be made only after consultation with all other trial level judges in the district, all local bar associations in the district, and any other person or group with an interest in the recommendation.

The trial court vacancy commission has thirty (30) days from receipt of the written recommendation provided for in subsection (a) to approve or reject it; provided, that the recommendation stands approved unless rejected by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire commission. No recommendation shall be rejected except following a public hearing of the commission held upon ten (10) days' advance notice to the presiding judge who made the recommendation and to the public. At the hearing, interested parties may present evidence on the issue. If the recommendation is not approved or rejected within thirty (30) days, the recommendation is considered approved.

Upon the trial court vacancy commission's approval of a recommendation pursuant to this section, it shall notify the governor of its decision. Upon receiving this recommendation, the governor shall send notice that a vacancy has occurred to the commission and shall fill the vacancy in accordance with title 17, chapter 4, part 3.

The administrative director of the courts shall notify the presiding judge of the affected district of the commission's action and shall notify the election commission of each county in the affected district of the type of judge and part of court of the judge to be elected. Upon receiving such information, each election commission shall prepare the ballot to be used in such judicial election accordingly.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 12; 1993, ch. 66, § 18; 1993, ch. 506, § 4; 2001, ch. 268, § 2; 2019, ch. 420, § 7.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the first sentence, in (a), substituted “trial court vacancy commission” for “judicial council”, and in the second sentence substituted “must be made” for “shall be made” in two places; rewrote (b), which read: “The judicial council shall have thirty (30) days from receipt of the written recommendation provided for in subsection (a) to approve or reject it; provided, that the recommendation shall stand approved unless rejected by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire council. No recommendation shall be rejected except following a public hearing of the council held upon ten (10) days' advance notice to the presiding judge who made the recommendation and to the public. At the hearing, interested parties may present evidence on the issue. If the recommendation is not approved or rejected within thirty (30) days, the recommendation shall be considered approved.”; and substituted “commission’s action” for “council’s action” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Because the General Assembly has not repealed title 16, chapter 21 of the Tennessee Code, and has specifically referred to it and identified it as providing the appropriate procedure for filling the three new judgeships created by S.B. 5/H.B. 10, 110th Gen. Assem. (2018), the Commission should comply with T.C.A. § 16-2-512 to the extent possible, even though the Judicial Council established by title 16, chapter 21, no longer exists. OAG 18-21, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (5/24/2018).

16-2-513. Formula for determining need for additional judges — Annual report.

The comptroller of the treasury shall devise and maintain a weighted caseload formula for the purpose of determining the need for creation or reallocation of judicial positions using case weights derived from the most recent weighted caseload study. The comptroller of the treasury shall update the formula at least annually. The comptroller of the treasury may adjust the formula as necessary to reflect the impact of any legislative enactment that is material to judicial caseloads.

Each district attorney general and each public defender, separately or through the appropriate conference, the council of juvenile and family court judges and the administrative office of the courts shall provide to the comptroller of the treasury information that the comptroller of the treasury determines is necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section. This information shall include caseload totals by appropriate case type for each study and total number of judicial, child support magistrates, district attorney and public defender resources for each district, noting how many are funded by the federal, state or local government. This data is to be provided to the comptroller in electronic and hard copy form on or before October 15 of each year.

Using such formula, information and adjustments, the comptroller of the treasury shall annually publish a weighted caseload report analyzing the current distribution of judicial positions throughout the state as well as the current need, if any, for creation of or reallocation of such positions.

The processing of case data by the administrative office of the courts for the purpose of providing the comptroller of the treasury with the information necessary to complete the weighted caseload study shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury. The audit shall ensure that the validation, verification and compilation of case data are performed in accordance with § 16-1-117(a).

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 13; 1989, ch. 240, §§ 1-4; 2001, ch. 408, § 5; 2002, ch. 791, § 5; 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references from “child support referee” to “child support magistrate” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “child support magistrates” for “child support referees” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 2. May 20, 2009.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislature’s authority to eliminate specific judicial positions. OAG 14-54, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (5/12/14)

16-2-514. Incumbent clerks and masters.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit, terminate or otherwise affect the term or future terms of office of any circuit court clerk, criminal court clerk or clerk and master. All such incumbents shall continue in office until the expiration of their respective terms of office and shall be eligible for reelection and reappointment.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to require, permit or authorize the consolidation of the offices of clerk and master, circuit court clerk or criminal court clerk or to place any clerk in a position of dominance over any other clerk.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 14.

16-2-515. References to judicial circuits or divisions deemed to judicial districts.

All references in Tennessee Code Annotated to “judicial circuits” or “chancery divisions” shall be deemed references to the judicial districts created by this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 25.

16-2-516. Pending cases — Process — Surety bonds — Applicability of local rules.

All process issued after September 1, 1984, shall be returnable at the times and places fixed by local court rules promulgated in accordance with this part. All bonds and undertakings executed after September 1, 1984, shall be governed by local court rules, insofar as to appearance dates and other conditions relating to time and place.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 27.

Code Commission Notes.

Former provisions in this section regarding cases pending prior to September 1, 1984, were deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2009.

16-2-517. Jurisdictions unaffected.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, nothing in this part shall be construed to repeal, amend or affect in any manner any jurisdiction granted to any local court by any public or private law.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 28.

16-2-518. Increase in positions or funding to office of public defender.

Any increase in local funding for positions or office expense for the district attorney general shall be accompanied by an increase in funding of seventy-five percent (75%) of the increase in funding to the office of the public defender in such district for the purpose of indigent criminal defense.

Acts 1992, ch. 965, § 7; 1994, ch. 1005, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 937, § 33 provided that, to the extent passage of that act, which enacted § 16-2-519 and amended § 16-2-506, creates additional staffing requirements for public defenders under the provisions of § 16-2-518, as it existed on January 1, 1994, it is the legislative intent to implement such increased staffing requirements only to the extent funds for such purpose are specifically provided in the General Appropriations Act. To the extent such funds are insufficient to fully implement such staffing requirements, the district public defenders conference and the commissioner of finance and administration shall determine the allocation of any such funds as may be available under the General Appropriations Acts to the various public defender districts.

Law Reviews.

What Price is Justice? Adequate funding for judicial system needs to be top priority of upcoming General Assembly (W. Andy Hardin), 37 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 23 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. State ownership of equipment purchased for public defender's office, OAG 99-033 (2/18/99).

The term “office expense” in T.C.A. § 16-2-518 includes the authorized costs of all items, including capital assets, that are incurred for the district attorney general’s office to perform its duties and responsibilities. OAG 18-40, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (8/29/2018).

16-2-519. Creation of assistant district attorney positions.

It is the declared policy of the general assembly to create assistant district attorney general (ADA) positions based upon the number of the ADA positions to population ratios being the primary consideration with secondary consideration being caseload when uniformly reported caseload statistics become available. The Tennessee district attorneys general conference is directed to make recommendations on this basis with the immediate objective being to achieve the following ratio:

Urban and rural districts—One (1) ADA per twenty thousand (20,000) population, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

As used in this section, “urban districts” means the second, sixth, eleventh, twentieth and thirtieth judicial districts and “rural districts” means all other judicial districts.

For the sole purpose of computing the one (1) assistant district attorney per twenty thousand (20,000) population, the district attorney general in any one (1) county judicial district having a population of less than fifty thousand (50,000) shall be counted as one-half (½) of an assistant district attorney.

Until the various judicial districts have attained approximate equality in ADA to population ratios, other factors are assigned a lower priority than ADA to population ratios. When the ratio set out in this section has been achieved, other factors, including uniform caseload statistics, local funding and geographic conditions that create logistical problems in covering the judicial district, shall be considered in support of additional position requests.

Acts 1994, ch. 937, § 1; 2019, ch. 420, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 937, § 32 provided that the provisions of that act, which enacted this section and amended § 16-2-506, shall take effect only to the extent funding is provided specifically for its implementation in the General Appropriations Act. To the extent such funding is insufficient to fully implement the provisions of the act, the district attorneys general conference and the commissioner of finance and administration shall determine which provisions of the act shall be implemented. Section 32 further directed the code commission to codify only those provisions of the act deemed to be funded by the district attorneys general conference as provided above.

For table of U.S.decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “is” for “and the Tennessee judicial council are” in the second sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.

16-2-520. Additional assistant district attorney general positions.

Effective July 1, 2004, there are created thirty (30) additional assistant district attorney general positions to be designated in judicial districts as provided in this section.

The executive director of the district attorneys general conference and the administrative director of the courts shall meet and prepare a report that contains the recommendations of such officials as to the specific judicial districts in which the additional assistant district attorney general positions created pursuant to subsection (a) should be designated. The report shall be prepared in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury.

By October 1, 2004, the executive director of the district attorneys general conference shall file the report prepared pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) with the speakers of the senate and house of representatives and chairs of the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives. Upon the filing of the report, the district attorneys general recommended by the report to receive additional assistant positions shall be authorized to interview and employ persons to fill such positions.

As early as is practicable during the first session of the 104th General Assembly, the general assembly shall consider and enact legislation that specifically designates the judicial district in which the persons employed in the additional assistant district attorney general positions created pursuant to subsection (a) will serve.

The number of assistant district attorney general positions created by this section or to which the district attorney general of each judicial district is entitled pursuant to § 16-2-506 or any other provision of law shall be the minimum number of positions authorized in each district. Nothing in this section or any other provision of law shall be construed to prohibit or prevent the employment of additional assistant district attorneys general in a particular judicial district, regardless of whether the positions are funded by a state or non-state source, or whether they are specifically enumerated in this section, § 16-2-506 or any other provision of law.

Acts 2004, ch. 916, § 1; 2006, ch. 815, § 2.

16-2-521. Number of criminal investigator positions to which district attorney general entitled pursuant to §
16-2-506.

The number of criminal investigator positions to which the district attorney general of each judicial district is entitled pursuant to § 16-2-506 or any other law shall be the minimum number of positions authorized in each judicial district. No law shall be construed to prohibit the employment of additional criminal investigators in a judicial district as established by § 16-2-506, regardless of whether the positions are funded by a state or non-state source, or whether they are specifically enumerated in any other law.

Acts 2013, ch. 68, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 68, § 4. July 1, 2013.